Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1111
Community work release and reentry centers; annual review; required visits.

The department shall develop an internal program to conduct annual reviews of the performance of each community work release and reentry center. A senior staff person of the department shall visit each center at least twice each year.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 68.